Washington statutes.
RCW 11.32.010

Appointment.

When, by reason of an action concerning the proof of a will, or from any other cause, there shall be a delay in granting letters testamentary or of administration, the judge may, in his or her discretion, appoint a special administrator (other than one of the parties) to collect and preserve the effects of the deceased; and in case of an appeal from the decree appointing such special administrator, he or she shall, nevertheless, proceed in the execution of his or her trust until he or she shall be otherwise ordered by the appellate court.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2025; 1965 c 145 s 11.32.010. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 81; RRS s 1451; prior: 1891 p 384 s 19; Code 1881 s 1419; 1863 p 222 s 137; 1860 p 184 s 104.]